Maryland, session 2026, SB0998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8A–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0998*

SENATE BILL 998
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Mobile home” means a structure:
(i) Transportable in one or more sections;
(ii) 8 or more body feet in width and 30 or more body feet in length;
(iii) Built on a permanent chassis; and
(iv) Designed to be used as a dwelling, with or without a permanent
foundation, when connected to the required utilities.
(2) “Mobile home” includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and
electrical systems contained in the structure.
(d) “Park” means any property leased or held out for lease to two or more residents
or prospective residents.
(f) “Park owner” means any person who has interest in the park and includes any
person acting as the agent of a park owner as to the managerial or operations acts taken
as the agent of the owner.
(h) “Rent” means any money or other consideration given for the right of use,
possession, and occupancy of the premises.
(j) (1) “Resident” means a mobile home owner who leases or rents a site for
residential use and resides in a mobile home park.
(2) “Resident” includes a person who maintains a permanent residence
with the mobile home owner, and who obtains title to the mobile home after the death of
the owner under the terms of a will or by operation of law.
SUBTITLE 4A. RENT.
8A–4A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(C) “EXTRAORDINARY EXPENSE” MEANS A NONRECURRING COST
INCURRED BY A PARK OWNER, INCLUDING A COST RESULTING FROM:

SENATE BILL 998 3
(1) MAJOR INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS;
(2) UTILITY SYSTEM FAILURES; AND
(3) GOVERNMENT–MANDATED IMPROVEMENTS.
8A–4A–02.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PARK
OWNER MAY NOT INCREASE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANNUAL RENT FOR A SITE FOR
AN EXISTING RESIDENT BY MORE THAN THE LESSER OF:
(1) THE MOST RECENT ANNUAL CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS, UNITED STATES CITY AVERAGE; OR
(2) AN AMOUNT NOT EXCEEDING 4% OF THE PREVIOUS ANNUAL RENT
FOR THE SITE.
(B) (1) A PARK OWNER MAY PETITION THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL
OF AN INCREASE IN EXCESS OF THE LIMITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IF THE INCREASE IS NECESSARY TO PAY FOR AN EXTRAORDINARY
EXPENSE.
(2) A PETITION FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) BE SUBMITTED ON A FORM AND IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED
BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) INCLUDE A WRITTEN EXPLANATION OF THE
EXTRAORDINARY EXPENSE;
(III) INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION SUPPORTING THE CLAIMED
EXTRAORDINARY EXPENSE; AND
(IV) PROVIDE A CALCULATION DEMONSTRATING WHY THE
PROPOSED INCREASE IS NECESSARY.
(C) A PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE REQUESTED
RENT INCREASE TO RESIDENTS AFFECTED BY A PROPOSED RENT INCREASE AT THE
TIME THE PETITION IS FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING:
(1) A COPY OF THE PETITION; AND

SENATE BILL 998
(2) INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMMENT PERIOD REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A 45–DAY COMMENT PERIOD FOR AFFECTED
RESIDENTS OR REPRESENTATIVES OF A RECOGNIZED HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
TO SUBMIT COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED INCREASE;
(II) CONSIDER ANY COMMENT RECEIVED BY AFFECTED
RESIDENTS OR REPRESENTATIVES OF A RECOGNIZED HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION
WHEN MAKING A DECISION TO APPROVE OR DENY A REQUESTED RENT INCREASE;
AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
APPROVE OR DENY A REQUESTED RENT INCREASE AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER
THE CLOSE OF THE COMMENT PERIOD.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A DECISION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF A PETITION.
(3) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT IMPLEMENT A RENT INCREASE
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
EARLIER THAN 120 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE PARK OWNER FILED THE PETITION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT IMPOSE A RENT INCREASE ON A RESIDENT
BECAUSE THE RESIDENT HAS:
(1) PARTICIPATED IN A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
(2) FILED A COMPLAINT WITH A GOVERNMENT AGENCY AGAINST THE
PARK OWNER;
(3) PROVIDED TESTIMONY OR INFORMATION IN A LEGAL OR
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING AGAINST THE PARK OWNER; OR
(4) EXERCISED A RIGHT UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.

SENATE BILL 998 5
(F) A RESIDENT OR A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION ACTING ON BEHALF OF
AFFECTED MEMBERS MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT ALLEGING A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) INVESTIGATE A COMPLAINT MADE BY A RESIDENT OR
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
(2) ISSUE ORDERS REQUIRING COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION BY A PARK OWNER;
(3) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(4) REFER A VIOLATION TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR LEGAL
ENFORCEMENT.
(H) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENJOIN ANY ACTS
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AND TO RECOVER CIVIL PENALTIES AUTHORIZED
UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.